Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.530

Community juvenile accountability programs—Effectiveness standards.

The legislature recognizes the importance of evaluation and outcome measurements of programs serving juvenile offenders in order to ensure cost-effective use of public funds.

The Washington state institute for public policy shall develop standards for measuring the effectiveness of juvenile accountability programs established and approved under RCW 13.40.510. The standards must be developed and presented to the governor and legislature not later than January 1, 1998. The standards must include methods for measuring success factors following intervention. Success factors include, but are not limited to, continued use of alcohol or controlled substances, arrests, violations of terms of community supervision, convictions for subsequent offenses, and restitution to victims.

[ 1997 c 338 s 63.]

NOTES:

Finding—Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338: See note following RCW 13.40.0357.

Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338 ss 60-64: See note following RCW 13.40.500.

Severability—Effective dates—1997 c 338: See notes following RCW 5.60.060.